Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin 148TH FIGHTER WING AIRCRAFT SHELTERS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $25,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the adjutant general for removal of old single-bay shelters and construction of new universal aircraft parking shelters for the 148th Fighter Wing, Minnesota Air National Guard at the Duluth Air National Guard Base. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until spent, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end